Arkansas, session 2025, HB1766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 60, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 16 — Students with Disabilities

6-60-1601. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Respond,
Innovate, Succeed, and Empower (RISE) Act".

6-60-1602. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Institution of higher education" means a public institution
of higher education, tribal college, or a private institution of higher
education that receives federal funding;
(2) "Plain language" means communication an audience can
understand the first time the audience reads or hears it; and
(3) "Student with a disability" means an admitted or enrolled
*CRH065*
04-02-2025 10:49:06 CRH065

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1766
student who meets the definition of an individual with a disability under the
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as it
existed on January 1, 2025, and includes a student with an intellectual
disability as defined in 34 C.F.R. § 668.231(b), as it existed on January 1,
2025, who is admitted or enrolled in a comprehensive transition or
postsecondary program as defined in 34 C.F.R. § 668.231(a), as it existed on
January 1, 2025.

6-60-1603. Policy — Documentation — Dissemination of information.
(a)(1) Each institution of higher education shall adopt a policy
providing that the documentation under subsection (b) of this section will be
considered in evaluating whether a student is a student with a disability.
(2) The institution of higher education may request additional
documentation if needed to evaluate whether a student is a student with a
disability.
(b) The following information submitted by either an admitted or an
enrolled student will be considered in evaluating whether a student is a
student with a disability:
(1) Documentation that the individual has had an individualized
education program as defined in § 6-41-217;
(2) Documentation that the individual has received services or
accommodations under a plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of
1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(3) Documentation of a plan or record of service for the
individual from a private school, a local educational agency, a state
educational agency, or an institution of higher education provided under a
plan under Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794 et
seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025, or in accordance with the Americans
with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as it existed on
January 1, 2025; or
(4) Documentation of a disability due to military service.
(c) The policy adopted under this subsection (a) of this section
shall:
(1) Be transparent and explicit; and
(2) Include information:
(A) Describing the process by which the institution of
04-02-2025 10:49:06 CRH065

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1766
higher education determines eligibility for accommodations for a student with
a disability; and
(B) Regarding any disability resource center or other
areas within the institution of higher education that provide accommodations
for students with disabilities, including without limitation housing and
residence life.
(e) Each institution of higher education shall disseminate the
information required under subsection (c) of this section:
(1) To applicants, students, parents, and faculty in plain
language and in formats consistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act
of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025; and
(2) During the student application process, at student
orientation, in academic catalogs, and on the institution of higher
education's public website.

6-60-1604. Establishment of reasonable accommodation.
(a)(1) An institution of higher education shall engage in an
interactive process to:
(A) Document the accommodation needs of a student with a
disability; and
(B) Establish a reasonable accommodation or accommodations
for a student with a disability.
(2) The institution of higher education may request additional
documentation if needed during the interactive process.
(b)(1) An institution of higher education shall include a
representative list of reasonable accommodations and disability resources for
students with a disability that is accessible to applicants, students,
parents, and faculty in plain language and in formats consistent with the
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as it
existed on January 1, 2025.
(2) Before a determination that a reasonable accommodation or
disability resource presented on a representative list for students with a
disability is provided under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the student
shall present written documentation indicating the need for the reasonable
accommodation or disability resource.
(3) The information required under subdivision (b)(1) of this
04-02-2025 10:49:06 CRH065

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1766
section shall be provided during the student application process, at student
orientation, in academic catalogs, and on the institution of higher
education's public website.
(c) The reasonable accommodations and disability resources available
to students shall be individualized and not limited to the list provided
under subsection (b) of this section.

6-60-1605. Requirements for institutions of higher education.
Each institution of higher education shall:
(1) Advise admitted students who have self-identified as having
a disability for which they are requesting an accommodation of the process
for requesting accommodations;
(2) Not require a student to be reevaluated for the presence of
a permanent disability if the student previously provided proof to the
institution of higher education of a permanent disability status; and
(3) Have an established process to follow if an instructor or
academic office believes that an accommodation would fundamentally or
substantially alter an essential requirement of a course or program or pose
an undue burden on the institution of higher education.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective January
1, 2026.

/s/Ennett












04-02-2025 10:49:06 CRH065